test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-runo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - runo: # Noun 'poem / runo' - full paradigm
     runo+N+Sg+Nom: runo
     runo+N+Sg+Gen: runon
     runo+N+Sg+Acc: [runo, runon]
     runo+N+Sg+Par: runuo
     runo+N+Sg+Tra: runokse
     runo+N+Sg+Abe: [runota, runottah]
     runo+N+Sg+Com: runonke
     runo+N+Sg+Ine: runos
     runo+N+Sg+Ela: [runospäi, runos]
     runo+N+Sg+Ill: runoh
     runo+N+Sg+Ade: runol
     runo+N+Sg+Abl: [runolpäi, runol]
     runo+N+Sg+All: runole
     runo+N+Sg+Ess: runonnu
     runo+N+Sg+Ter: runossah
     runo+N+Sg+Apr: runolluo
     runo+N+Pl+Nom: runot
     runo+N+Pl+Gen: runoloin
     runo+N+Pl+Acc: runot
     runo+N+Pl+Par: runoloi
     runo+N+Pl+Tra: runoloikse
     runo+N+Pl+Abe: [runoloita, runoloittah]
     runo+N+Pl+Com: runoloinke
     runo+N+Pl+Ine: runolois
     runo+N+Pl+Ela: [runoloispäi, runolois]
     runo+N+Pl+Ill: runoloih
     runo+N+Pl+Ade: runoloil
     runo+N+Pl+Abl: [runoloilpäi, runoloil]
     runo+N+Pl+All: runoloile
     runo+N+Pl+Ess: runoloinnu
     runo+N+Pl+Ins: runoloin
     runo+N+Pl+Apr: runoloilluo
     runo+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: runogi
     runo+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: runongi
     runo+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [runogi, runongi]
     runo+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: runuogi
     runo+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: runoksegi
     runo+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [runotagi, runottahgi]
     runo+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: runonkegi
     runo+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: runosgi
     runo+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [runospäigi, runosgi]
     runo+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: runohgi
     runo+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: runolgi
     runo+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [runolpäigi, runolgi]
     runo+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: runolegi
     runo+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: runonnugi
     runo+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: runossahgi
     runo+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: runolluogi
     runo+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: runotgi
     runo+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: runoloingi
     runo+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: runotgi
     runo+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: runoloigi
     runo+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: runoloiksegi
     runo+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [runoloitagi, runoloittahgi]
     runo+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: runoloinkegi
     runo+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: runoloisgi
     runo+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [runoloispäigi, runoloisgi]
     runo+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: runoloihgi
     runo+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: runoloilgi
     runo+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [runoloilpäigi, runoloilgi]
     runo+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: runoloilegi
     runo+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: runoloinnugi
     runo+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: runoloingi
     runo+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: runoloilluogi
